Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.245

Corporate action—Vote of shareholders.

A corporation may agree to submit a corporate action to a vote of its shareholders whether or not the board of directors determines at any time subsequent to approving such a corporate action that it no longer recommends the corporate action.

[ 2011 c 328 s 4.]